Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-524
State Fire Marshal; office; salaries; expenses; payment.

The State Fire Marshal shall keep on file in his office an itemized statement of all salaries and expenses incurred by his office, and shall approve all vouchers issued therefor, before they are submitted to the Director of Administrative Services for payment, which shall be allowed and paid in the same manner as other claims against the state.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 23, p. 489;

C.S.1929, § 81-5523;

R.S.1943, § 81-524.